District of Columbia statutes.
47-2701

Permit required.

(a)

Excepting sales made under authority of law, it shall be unlawful in the District of Columbia for any person, firm, or corporation, either for himself or itself, or for another, or for any firm, or corporation to sell or offer at public auction any stock or stocks of merchandise, in whole or in part, without first obtaining from the Mayor of the District of Columbia a written or printed permit so to do; and the Mayor shall not issue a permit for any such sale or sales until he is satisfied that neither fraud nor deception of any kind is contemplated or will be practiced, and that neither the sale, the reasons therefor nor the goods to be sold have not already been or will not thereafter be fraudulently or falsely advertised or in any wise whatsoever misrepresented.

(b)

Any license issued pursuant to this subchapter shall be issued as an Inspected Sales and Services endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of this title.

Sept. 8, 1916, 39 Stat. 846, ch. 473, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(5), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(3), 50 DCR 6913
License law, auctioneer licenses, see § 47-2808.
License law, Council may regulate, modify or eliminate license requirements, see § 47-2842.
1981 Ed., § 47-2701.
1973 Ed., § 47-2201.
D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “an Inspected Sales and Services endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “a Class A Inspected Sales and Services endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(3) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).